New York, session 2025-2026, S3724.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 97-a of the alcoholic beverage control law is 2 REPEALED and a new section 97-a is added to read as follows: 3 § 97-a. Temporary retail permit. 1. The authority is hereby authorized 4 to issue a temporary retail permit: 5 (a) to the transferee of a retail license to continue the operations 6 of a retail premises during the period a transfer application for the 7 license from person to person at the same premises is pending; or 8 (b) to an applicant for a premises that is not licensed in a munici- 9 pality with a population of less than one million. 10 2. Such a permit may be issued if all of the following conditions are 11 met: 12 (a) The applicant for the temporary retail permit shall have filed 13 with the authority an application for a retail license at such premises, 14 together with all required filing and license fees; 15 (b) The applicant shall have filed with the authority an application 16 for a temporary retail permit, accompanied by a nonrefundable filing fee 17 of either one hundred twenty-eight dollars for all retail beer licenses 18 or six hundred forty dollars for all other retail licenses; 19 (c) In the case of a transfer application, the premises shall have 20 been operated under a retail license within thirty days of the date of 21 filing the application for a temporary permit; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07484-01-5 S. 3724 2 1 (d) In the case of a transfer application, the current license in 2 effect at said premises must be surrendered or placed in safekeeping 3 with the authority. 4 3. A temporary retail permit under paragraph (b) of subdivision one of 5 this section may not be issued for any premises that is subject to the 6 provisions of subdivision seven of section sixty-four, subdivision seven 7 of section sixty-four-a, subdivision five of section sixty-four-b, 8 subdivision twelve of section sixty-four-c, subdivision eight of section 9 sixty-four-d or subdivision three of section one hundred five of this 10 chapter. 11 4. A temporary permit issued by the authority pursuant to this section 12 shall be for a period not to exceed ninety days. A temporary permit may 13 be extended at the discretion of the authority, for an additional thirty 14 day period. 15 5. A temporary retail permit is a conditional permit and authorizes 16 the holder thereof: 17 (a) In the case of a transfer application, to purchase and sell such 18 alcoholic beverages as would be permitted to be purchased and sold under 19 the privileges of the retail license for which the transfer application 20 has been made; 21 (b) In the case of all other retail applications, to purchase and sell 22 such alcoholic beverages as would be permitted to be purchased and sold 23 under the privileges of the license applied for; and 24 (c) To sell such alcoholic beverages to consumers only and not for 25 resale. 26 6. The holder of a temporary retail permit shall purchase alcoholic 27 beverages only by payment in currency or check on or before the day such 28 alcoholic beverages are delivered, provided, however, that the holder of 29 a temporary retail permit who also holds one or more retail licenses and 30 is operating under such retail license or licenses in addition to the 31 temporary retail permit, and who is not delinquent under the provisions 32 of section one hundred one-aa or one hundred one-aaa of this chapter as 33 to any retail license under which it operates, may purchase alcoholic 34 beverages on credit under the temporary permit. 35 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a temporary permit may 36 be summarily cancelled or suspended at any time if the authority deter- 37 mines that good cause for such cancellation or suspension exists. The 38 authority shall promptly notify the holder of a temporary permit in 39 writing of such cancellation or suspension and shall set forth the 40 reasons for such action. 41 8. Application for a temporary permit shall be on such form as the 42 authority shall prescribe. 43 9. Approval of or extension of a temporary retail permit shall not be 44 deemed as an approval of the retail application. 45 10. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary, 46 the authority may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be neces- 47 sary to carry out the provisions of this section. 48 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.